California statutes. Education Code
(B) Additionally and separately, for county offices of education, budgeted expenditures of finds apportioned pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2574 for the ensuing fiscal year on the planned actions and services to meet the goals included in the local control and accountability plan.

(C) Additionally and separately, for county offices of education, budgeted expenditures of funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2575.5 for the ensuing fiscal year on the planned actions and services to meet the goals included in the local control and accountability plan.

(4) The total budgeted expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year on the planned actions and services included in the local control and accountability plan that contribute to the increased or improved services for
 unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(5) The total budgeted expenditures for the existing fiscal year on the planned actions and services included in the local control and accountability plan that contribute to the increased or improved services for unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(6) The estimated actual expenditures for the existing fiscal year on the planned actions and services included in the local control and accountability plan that contribute to the increased or improved services for unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(7) A brief description of the activities or programs supported by any expenditures described in paragraph (2) that are not included in paragraph (3).

(8) To the extent there is any difference between the expenditures described in paragraph (4) and the revenue described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), a brief description of how the actions and services included in the local control and accountability plan improve services for unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(9) A brief description of how any difference between the expenditures described in paragraph (5) that are not included in
 paragraph (6) impacted the planned actions and services included in the local control and accountability plan that contribute to the increased or improved services for unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.07, and the overall increased or improved services for unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(10) For county offices of education, a brief description of activities supported by the expenditures described in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) that are not included in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (3).

(11) The name and contact information for the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(c) (1) The local control funding formula
 budget overview for parents shall be subject to all of the following requirements for adoption, review, and approval of the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan:

(A) For a school district, Sections 52062, 52065, and 52070.

(B) For a county superintendent of schools, Sections 52065, 52068, and 52070.5.

(C) For a charter school, Section 47604.33 and subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 47606.5.

(2) (A) A local control funding formula budget overview for parents filed by the governing board of a school district with a county superintendent of schools, or a local control funding
 formula budget overview for parents filed by a county board of education with the Superintendent, shall be approved by the county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent, as applicable, if it adheres to the template adopted by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (e) and follows any instructions or directions for completing the template developed by the Superintendent.

(B) If a county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent does not approve a local control funding formula budget overview for parents pursuant to subparagraph (A), the county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent shall withhold approval of the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan filed by the governing board of the school district or county board of education and shall provide technical
 assistance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52071 or subdivision (b) of Section 52071.5.

(d) The template for the local control funding formula budget overview for parents developed pursuant to subdivision (e) shall, to the greatest extent practicable, use language that is understandable and accessible to parents. The information specified in subdivision (b) shall be displayed, to the greatest extent practicable, using visuals and graphics.

(e) (1) The Superintendent, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, shall develop a template for the local control funding formula budget overview for parents on or before December 31, 2018. In developing the template, the Superintendent shall not require school districts to provide any
 information in addition to the information required pursuant to subdivision (b) and shall establish reasonable word or character limits for the information required pursuant to subdivision (b), as appropriate.

(2) The Superintendent, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, shall update the template for the local control funding formula budget overview for parents, on or before December 31, 2024, to reflect county office of education requirements pursuant to subdivision (b) imposed by Section 63 of Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2023.

(3) The development of the template for the local control funding formula budget overview for parents shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 194, Sec. 19.   (SB 141)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52064.4.

(a) On or before January 31, 2025, the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064 shall specify that all funds received by the local educational agency pursuant to Section 32526 and subject to the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 32526 shall be included in the local control and accountability plan, or the annual update to the plan, for the period of July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2028, inclusive. The instructions shall be updated to address all of the following:

(1) Require identification of all planned expenditures using the funds apportioned pursuant to Section 32526 in the local control and accountability plan within the description of the associated actions
 and analysis of the implementation of those planned expenditures in the annual update.

(2) Require identification of at least one metric to monitor the impact of each identified action or service.

(3) Require the local educational agency to articulate the rationale for selecting among the permissible use of funds based on the needs assessment required under subdivision (d) of Section 32526, including identification of how the selected actions are expected to address the identified areas of need, based on one or more metrics, and for pupils or schools in the greatest need, as identified by the metrics in the needs assessment.

(4) Require the action description to explain how research supports each selected action or service based on the identified area or areas of need set forth in the needs assessment required under
 subdivision (d) of Section 32526.

(5) Specify that the requirements in Section 52064 for school districts receiving technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071 include assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (b).

(6) For the 2027–28 local control and accountability plan, or the annual update to the plan, require the local educational agency to review the rationale for selecting among the permissible use of funds included in the 2025–26 local control or accountability plan, or the annual update to the plan, pursuant to paragraph (3) in order to assess the overall effectiveness of the chosen strategy and whether adjustments to the chosen approach are warranted based on progress shown on the relevant metrics.

(b) School districts receiving technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071 and county offices of
 education providing technical assistance are encouraged to use technical assistance to support the school district in conducting the needs assessment pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 32526 and a selection of actions funded by the Learning Recovery Emergency Block Grant or evaluation of implementation of those actions, as applicable, pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2028, and, as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 72.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Inoperative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

52064.5.

(a) On or before October 1, 2016, the state board shall adopt evaluation rubrics for all of the following purposes:

(1) To assist a school district, county office of education, or charter school in evaluating its strengths, weaknesses, and areas that require improvement.

(2) To assist a county superintendent of schools, the department, or a chartering authority in identifying school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools in need of technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071, 52071.5, or 47607.3, as applicable, and the specific priorities upon which the technical assistance should be focused.

(3) To assist
 the Superintendent in identifying school districts and county offices of education for which intervention pursuant to Section 52072 or 52072.5, as applicable, is warranted.

(b) The evaluation rubrics shall reflect a holistic, multidimensional assessment of school district and individual schoolsite performance and shall include all of the state priorities described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060.

(c) As part of the evaluation rubrics, the state board shall adopt state and local indicators to measure school district and individual schoolsite performance in regard to each of the state priorities described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060. No later than January 31, 2021, local indicators shall reflect school-level data to the extent the department collects or otherwise has access to relevant and reliable school-level data for all schools statewide.

(d) The state board may adopt alternate methods for calculating the state and local indicators described in subdivision (c) for alternative schools, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 52052, if appropriate to more fairly evaluate the performance of these schools or of a specific category of these schools. Alternate methods may include an individual pupil growth model.

(e) (1) As part of the evaluation rubrics, the state board shall adopt standards for school district and individual schoolsite performance and expectations for improvement in regard to each of the state priorities described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060. The standards shall be based on the state and local indicators specified in subdivision (c).

(2) (A) No later than January 31, 2020, the standards
 for local indicators shall, at a minimum, ensure that the governing board of a school district, the county board of education, and the governing body of a charter school review any data to be publicly reported for the local indicators in conjunction with the adoption of a local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 52062, 52068, or 47606.5, as applicable. No later than January 31, 2021, the standards for local indicators for which the department collects or otherwise has access to relevant and reliable school-level data for all schools statewide shall, to the extent practicable, be based on objective criteria, which may include, but are not necessarily limited to, the extent of any disparities across schoolsites within a school district or county office of education or performance relative to statewide data.

(B) If the governing board of a school district, the county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school is
 unable to review any data required pursuant to subparagraph (A) due to any of the events described in subdivision (a) of Section 46392, the local indicator data shall be reviewed at the next meeting of the governing board or body and a resolution shall be adopted and submitted to the department with the following information:

(i) A description of the emergency event.

(ii) The date on which the local indicator data was reviewed.

(f) (1) The department, in collaboration with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board, shall develop and maintain the California School Dashboard, a web-based system for publicly reporting performance data on the state and local indicators included in the evaluation rubrics.

(2) The public reporting of performance data on state and local indicators via the web-based system shall be completed on or before the following dates for the prior school year:

(A) December 15, 2023.

(B) December 1, 2024.

(C) November 15, 2025.

(D) October 15, 2026, and October 15 of each year thereafter.

(3) Timelines associated with the collection of data through the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System pursuant to Section 60900 shall be adjusted to support the public reporting dates in paragraph (2).

(g) (1) As part of the evaluation rubrics, the state board shall adopt
 performance criteria for local educational agency assistance and intervention pursuant to Sections 47607.3, 52071, 52071.5, 52072, and 52072.5. The criteria shall be based on performance by pupil subgroups either across two or more of the state and local indicators specified in subdivision (c) or across two or more of the state priorities described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060 and subdivision (d) of Section 52066. The criteria may also be based on performance by an all pupils subgroup, comprised of at least 30 pupils at a local educational agency, in addition to the criteria based on performance by pupil subgroups.

(2) (A) No later than July 15, 2026, the state board shall update the performance criteria, taking into consideration the findings and recommendations from the state-funded evaluation of the state’s differentiated assistance system and its implementation, pursuant to Section 127 of Chapter 44 of the
 Statutes of 2021, as amended by Section 37 of Chapter 252 of the Statutes of 2021, and the need to appropriately focus resources and supports where the demonstrated needs are greatest.

(B) No later than May 15, 2029, the state board shall do all of the following:

(i) Provide recommendations to the Legislature regarding possible statutory changes to ensure the performance criteria for alternative schools, as described in subdivision (d), is based on methods of measuring performance that fairly evaluate the performance of local educational agencies serving alternative school pupil populations.

(ii) Provide recommendations to the Legislature regarding possible statutory changes to ensure the performance criteria for assistance and intervention pursuant to Sections 52072 and 52072.5 are based on factors that demonstrate
 the local educational agency is in need of intensive, extended support, and is not duplicative of performance criteria pursuant to Sections 47607.3, 52071, and 52071.5.

(iii) Update the performance criteria for local educational assistance and intervention pursuant to Sections 52072 and 52072.5, taking into consideration the impact of any updates to the performance criteria pursuant to Sections 47607.3, 52071, and 52071.5, and any relevant research conducted on differentiated assistance, direct technical assistance, and the statewide system of support.

(3) Beginning with the release of the 2026 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f), and every three years thereafter, the department shall determine local educational agency eligibility for assistance and intervention pursuant to Sections 47607.3, 52071, and 52071.5, according to the performance criteria adopted by
 the state board pursuant to paragraph (2).

(h) The department shall annually publish information on the following:

(1) All school districts and county offices of education identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52071.1 and subdivision (a) of section 52071.51.

(2) All local educational agencies identified for prioritized support through universal assistance pursuant to Section 2575.35, as determined by using solely the most recent year of performance data on the state indicators and the performance criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (g) for local
 educational agency assistance and intervention under Sections 47607.3, 52071, and 52071.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 21.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52065.

(a) The superintendent of a school district shall do both of the following:

(1) Prominently post on the homepage of the internet website of the school district any local control and accountability plan approved by the governing board of the school district and the county superintendent of schools, and any updates, revisions, or addenda, including those to comply with federal law, to a local control and accountability plan approved by the governing board of the school district.

(2) Prominently post all local control and accountability plans submitted by charter schools that were authorized by the school district, or links to those plans, and any updates, revisions, or addenda, including those to
 comply with federal law, on the internet website of the school district.

(b) A county superintendent of schools shall do both of the following:

(1) Prominently post on the homepage of the internet website of the county office of education any local control and accountability plan approved by the county board of education and the Superintendent, and any updates, revisions, or addenda, including those to comply with federal law, to a local control and accountability plan approved by the county board of education.

(2) Prominently post all local control and accountability plans submitted by school districts and charter schools,
 or links to those plans, on the internet website of the county office of education.

(c) (1) (A) Each school district shall post the current school year’s local control and accountability plan that has been adopted by the governing board of the school district pursuant to
 Section 52060, and that has been approved by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 52070, on the performance overview portion of the California School Dashboard, established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5.

(B) Each county office of education shall post the current school year’s local control and accountability plan that has been adopted by the county board of education pursuant to Section 52066, and that has been approved by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 52070.5, on the performance overview portion of the California School Dashboard, established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5.

(C) Each charter school shall post the current school year’s local control and accountability plan that has been adopted by the governing body of the charter school pursuant to Section 47606.5, and submitted to its chartering authority and the
 county superintendent of schools, or only to the county superintendent of schools if the county board of education is the chartering authority, pursuant to Section 47606.5, on the performance overview portion of the California School Dashboard, established pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5.

(2) The department shall notify each school district, county office of education, and charter school of the requirement to comply with the requirements of paragraph (1) and shall ensure that each school district, county office of education, and charter school has complied with the requirements of paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   (SB 609)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52065.1.

(a) (1) If a local educational agency is identified pursuant to the audit described in Section 41020 as not having adopted a local control and accountability plan by July 1, as required pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable, or as not having adopted an annual update to a local control and accountability plan by July 1, as required pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable, the local educational agency shall be assessed a financial penalty equal to 20 percent of the local educational agency’s second principal apportionment local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 2574, 2575, or 42238.02, as applicable.

(2) For each additional business day that the local
 educational agency does not adopt a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to a local control and accountability, the penalty described in paragraph (1) shall be increased by 1 percent of the local educational agency’s second principal apportionment local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 2574, 2575, or 42238.02, as applicable, but shall not exceed a total of 80 percent of the second principal apportionment.

(b) A financial penalty applied pursuant to subdivision (a) shall (1) be a reduction to the principal apportionment made to the local educational agency for the applicable fiscal year pursuant to Section 41330, 41332, or 41335, as applicable, (2) not reduce the final apportionment below the amount necessary to meet the requirements of Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution, as specified in Section 41975, and Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, and (3) be
 modified, as applicable, if the delay is due to any of the events described in subdivision (a) of Section 46392.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 49.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

52066.

(a) On or before July 1, 2014, each county superintendent of schools shall develop, and present to the county board of education for adoption, a local control and accountability plan using a template adopted by the state board.

(b) A local control and accountability plan adopted by a county board of education shall be effective for a period of three years, and shall be updated on or before July 1 of each year.

(c) A local control and accountability plan adopted by a county board of education shall include, for each school or program operated by the county superintendent of schools, all of the information specified in the template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064.

(d) All of the following are state priorities for purposes of a county board of education’s local control and accountability plan:

(1) The degree to which the teachers in the schools or programs operated by the county superintendent of schools are appropriately assigned in accordance with Section 44258.9 and fully credentialed in the subject areas, and, for the pupils they are teaching, every pupil in the schools or programs operated by the county superintendent of schools has sufficient access to the standards-aligned instructional materials as determined pursuant to Section 60119, and school facilities are maintained in good repair as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(2) Implementation of the academic content and performance standards adopted by the state board, including how the programs and services
 will enable English learners to access the common core academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 and the English language development standards adopted pursuant to former Section 60811.3, as that section read on June 30, 2013, or former Section 60811.4, as that section read on June 30, 2016, for purposes of gaining academic content knowledge and English language proficiency.

(3) (A) Parental involvement and family engagement, including efforts the county superintendent of schools makes to seek parent input in making decisions for each individual schoolsite and program operated by a county superintendent of schools, and including how the county superintendent of schools will promote parental participation in programs for unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs.

(B) Family engagement may include, but need not be limited
 to, efforts by the county superintendent of schools and each individual schoolsite to apply research-based practices, such as welcoming all families into the school community, engaging in effective two-way communication, supporting pupil success, and empowering families to advocate for equity and access. Family engagement may include, but need not be limited to, treating families as partners to inform, influence, and create practices and programs that support pupil success and collaboration with families and the broader community, expand pupil learning opportunities and community services, and promote civic participation.

(4) Pupil achievement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:

(A) Statewide assessments administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 or any subsequent assessment, as certified by the state board.

(B) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for entrance to the University of California and the California State University.

(C) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for career technical education sequences or programs of study that align with state board-approved career technical education standards and frameworks, including, but not limited to, those described in subdivision (a) of Section 52302, subdivision (a) of Section 52372.5, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 54692.

(D) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed both types of courses described in subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(E) The percentage of English learner
 pupils who make progress toward English proficiency as measured by the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California or any subsequent assessment of English proficiency, as certified by the state board.

(F) The English learner reclassification rate.

(G) The percentage of pupils who have passed an advanced placement examination with a score of 3 or higher.

(H) The percentage of pupils who demonstrate college preparedness pursuant to the Early Assessment Program, as described in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 99300) of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3, or any subsequent assessment of college preparedness.

(5) Pupil engagement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:

(A) School attendance rates.

(B) Chronic absenteeism rates.

(C) Middle school dropout rates.

(D) High school dropout rates.

(E) High school graduation rates.

(6) School climate, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:

(A) Pupil suspension rates.

(B) Pupil expulsion rates.

(C) Other local measures, including surveys of pupils, parents, and teachers on the sense of safety and school connectedness.

(7) The extent
 to which pupils have access to, and are enrolled in, a broad course of study that includes all of the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable, including the programs and services developed and provided to unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs, and the programs and services that are provided to benefit these pupils as a result of the funding received pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(8) Pupil outcomes, if available, in the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable.

(9) How the county superintendent of schools will coordinate instruction of expelled pupils pursuant to Section 48926.

(10) How the county superintendent of
 schools will coordinate services for foster children, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Working with the county child welfare agency to minimize changes in school placement.

(B) Providing education-related information to the county child welfare agency to assist the county child welfare agency in the delivery of services to foster children, including, but not limited to, educational status and progress information that is required to be included in court reports.

(C) Responding to requests from the juvenile court for information and working with the juvenile court to ensure the delivery and coordination of necessary educational services.

(D) Establishing a mechanism for the efficient expeditious transfer of health and education
 records and the health and education passport.

(e) For purposes of the descriptions required by subdivision (b) of Section 52064, a county board of education may consider qualitative information, including, but not limited to, findings that result from school quality reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52052 or any other reviews.

(f) To the extent practicable, data reported in a local control and accountability plan shall be reported in a manner consistent with how information is reported on the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(g) The county superintendent of schools shall consult with teachers, principals, administrators, other school personnel, local bargaining units of the county office of education, parents, and pupils in developing a
 local control and accountability plan.

(h) A county board of education may identify local priorities, goals in regard to the local priorities, and the method for measuring the county office of education’s progress toward achieving those goals.

(i) (1) Beginning with the 2018–19 fiscal year and in each fiscal year thereafter, a county superintendent of schools shall prepare a summary of how the county superintendent of schools plans to support school districts and schools within the county in implementing this article and present the summary to the county board of education at the same public meeting required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 52068. The summary shall include, but is not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) A description of how the county
 superintendent of schools will support the continuous improvement of all school districts within the county, including, at a minimum, clearly identifying the activities being performed by the county office of education and the source of funding for those activities. This description shall include the steps that the county superintendent of schools plans to take to collaborate with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, the department, the lead agencies specified in Sections 52073 and 52073.1, and other county superintendents of schools to support school districts and schools within the county in implementing this article.

(B) A description of how the county superintendent of schools will assist each school district identified
 for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071 and each charter school identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3 in improving pupil outcomes, including, at a minimum, clearly identifying the activities being performed by the county office of education and the source of funding for those activities. This description shall include the actions the school district and charter school will take independent of the county superintendent of schools to improve pupil outcomes pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 52071 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3.

(C) One or more goals for each of the following:

(i) Completing the review of local control and accountability plans submitted by school districts pursuant to Section 52070.

(ii) Providing technical assistance to school districts pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 52071 and charter schools pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47607.3.

(iii) Providing universal and targeted assistance to local educational agencies pursuant to Section 2575.35.

(iv) Providing any other support to school districts and schools within the county in implementing this article.

(v) Providing support to school districts in developing and implementing the addendum specified in Section 52064.3.

(D) One or more metrics to assess progress toward each goal identified in subparagraph (C).

(E) Specific actions and related expenditures to achieve each goal identified in subparagraph (C), to the extent this information is not provided pursuant to subparagraph (B). The specific actions shall not supersede the provisions of existing local collective bargaining agreements within the jurisdiction of the county superintendent of schools.

(2) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year and in each fiscal year thereafter, the county
 superintendent of schools shall submit the summary described in this subdivision with its local control and accountability plan pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52070.5.

(3) On or before November 1 of each year, the department shall compile the information provided by county superintendents of schools pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) into a single document and shall make this report available to the public on the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 107.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52067.

On or before July 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, a county board of education shall update the local control and accountability plan. The annual update shall be developed using a template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and shall include all of the information specified in the template.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 26.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

52068.

(a) Before the county board of education considers the adoption of a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The county superintendent of schools shall present the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan to a parent advisory committee established pursuant to Section 52069 for review and comment. The county superintendent of schools shall respond, in writing, to comments received from the parent advisory committee.

(2) The county superintendent of schools shall present the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local
 control and accountability plan to the English learner parent advisory committee established pursuant to Section 52069, if applicable, for review and comment. The county superintendent of schools shall respond, in writing, to comments received from the English learner parent advisory committee.

(3) The county superintendent of schools shall notify members of the public of the opportunity to submit written comments regarding the specific actions and expenditures proposed to be included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan, using the most efficient method of notification possible. This paragraph shall not require a county superintendent of schools to produce printed notices or to send notices by mail. The county superintendent of schools shall ensure that all written notifications related to the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and
 accountability plan are provided consistent with Section 48985.

(4) The county superintendent of schools shall review school plans submitted pursuant to Section 64001 for schools operated by the county superintendent of schools and ensure that the specific actions included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan are consistent with strategies included in the school plans submitted pursuant to Section 64001.

(5) The county superintendent of schools shall consult with its special education local plan area administrator or administrators to determine that specific actions for individuals with exceptional needs are included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan, and are consistent with strategies included in the annual assurances support plan for the
 education of individuals with exceptional needs.

(6) (A) The county superintendent of schools shall present a report on the annual update to the local control and accountability plan and the local control funding formula budget overview for parents on or before February 28 of each year as part of a nonconsent item at a regularly scheduled meeting of the county board of education.

(B) The report shall include all of the following:

(i) All available midyear outcome data related to metrics identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.

(ii) All available midyear expenditure and implementation data on all actions identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.

(b) (1) The county board of education shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit the recommendations and comments of members of the public regarding the specific actions and expenditures proposed to be included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. The agenda for the public hearing shall be posted at least 72 hours before the public hearing and shall include the location where the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan, and any comments received pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), will be available for public inspection. The public hearing shall be held at the same meeting as the public hearing required by Section 1620.

(2) The county board of education shall adopt a local control and
 accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan in a public meeting. This meeting shall be held after, but not on the same day as, the public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (1). This meeting shall be the same meeting as that during which the county board of education adopts a budget pursuant to Section 1622.

(c) A county superintendent of schools may develop and present to a county board of education for adoption revisions to a local control and accountability plan during the period the local control and accountability plan is in effect. The county board of education may only adopt a revision to a local control and accountability plan if it follows the process to adopt a local control and accountability plan pursuant to this section and the revisions are adopted in a public meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 75.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52069.
